Utah statutes.
62A-1-117.   Assignment of support -- Children in state custody.
(1)  Child support is assigned to the department by operation of law when a
child is residing outside of his home in the protective custody, temporary
custody, custody, or care of the state for at least 30 days.
(2)  The department has the right to receive payment for child support
assigned to it under Subsection (1).
(3)  The Office of Recovery Services is the payee for the department for
payment received under this section.
